Maryland, session 2026, HB0447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Declaration of Rights
ARTICLE 49.
(A) EVERY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE RIGHT TO HUNT, FISH, AND HARVEST
WILDLIFE, INCLUDING THE RIGHT TO USE TRADITIONAL METHODS TO HUNT, FISH,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0447*

HOUSE BILL 447
AND HARVEST WILDLIFE, SUBJECT TO REGULATIONS AND RESTRICTIONS UNDER
LAWS THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ENACTS, TO:
(1) PROMOTE WILDLIFE CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT; AND
(2) PRESERVE THE FUTURE OF HUNTING AND FISHING.
(B) NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE MAY BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE
APPLICATION OF ANY PROVISION OF LAW RELATING TO TRESPASS OR PROPERTY
RIGHTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–103.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Fishing is a valued part of the State’s cultural and social heritage that
provides unique recreational benefits to residents of the State; and
(2) Fishing plays an important part in the State’s economy by contributing
to tax revenues and employment and supports the conservation, preservation, and
management of the State’s fisheries, natural areas, and water resources.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that [residents]:
(1) RESIDENTS of the State have [a] THE right to fish, INCLUDING THE
RIGHT TO USE TRADITIONAL METHODS TO FISH, subject to regulations and restrictions
under laws that the General Assembly enacts;
(2) THE RIGHT TO FISH SHALL BE FOREVER PRESERVED FOR THE
PUBLIC GOOD; AND
(3) FISHING SHALL BE A PREFERRED MEANS OF MANAGING AND
CONTROLLING WILDLIFE IN THE STATE.
10–102.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Hunting is a valued part of the State’s cultural and social heritage that
provides unique recreational benefits to residents of the State; and

HOUSE BILL 447 3
(2) Hunting plays an important part in the State’s economy by contributing
to tax revenues and employment and, through the receipt of federal funds, supports the
conservation, preservation, and management of the State’s wildlife, natural areas, and
related resources.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that [residents]:
(1) RESIDENTS of the State have [a] THE right to hunt, INCLUDING THE
RIGHT TO USE TRADITIONAL METHODS TO HUNT, subject to regulations and restrictions
under laws that the General Assembly enacts;
(2) THE RIGHT TO HUNT SHALL BE FOREVER PRESERVED FOR THE
PUBLIC GOOD; AND
(3) HUNTING SHALL BE A PREFERRED MEANS OF MANAGING AND
CONTROLLING WILDLIFE IN THE STATE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 1 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 5 of this
Act, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that the
constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general
election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.